Utah statutes.
26-18-305.   Report on implementation.
The department shall report to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee
by November 1, 1994, and every year thereafter on the implementation of the
grant program for primary care services. The report shall include a
description of the scope and level of coverage provided to low-income persons
by primary care grant programs.
